Utah statutes.
31A-23b-204.   Character requirements.

An applicant for a license under this chapter shall demonstrate to the commissioner that:

(1)  the applicant has the intent, in good faith, to engage in the practice of a navigator as the license would permit;

(2) (a)  if a natural person, the applicant is competent and trustworthy; or

(b)  if the applicant is an agency:

(i)  the partners, directors, or principal officers or persons having comparable powers are trustworthy; and

(ii)  that it will transact business in a way that the acts that may only be performed by a licensed navigator are performed only by a natural person who is licensed under this chapter, or Chapter 23a, Insurance Marketing-Licensing Producers, Consultants, and Reinsurance Intermediaries;

(3)  the applicant intends to comply with the surety bond requirements of Section 31A-23b-207;

(4)  if a natural person, the applicant is at least 18 years of age; and

(5)  the applicant does not have a conflict of interest as defined by regulations issued under PPACA.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

